Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Eighty-six
Thousand Dollars ($186,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be utilized as
follows:
1. Ninety-three Thousand Dollars ($93,000.00) shall be used at
the Oklahoma School for the Blind to establish and maintain a School
Resource Officer Program or provide physical security enhancements

including, but not limited to, school resource officers, cameras,
gates, lighting, locks, doors, windows, security geofencing,
ballistic storm shelters, and mobile panic alert systems; and
2. Ninety-three Thousand Dollars ($93,000.00) shall be used at
the Oklahoma School for the Deaf to establish and maintain a School
Resource Officer Program or provide physical security enhancements
including, but not limited to, school resource officers, cameras,
gates, lighting, locks, doors, windows, security geofencing,
ballistic storm shelters, and mobile panic alert systems.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4067 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4067 Page 3